apertium-frp.frp.metadix
<pardef n="coué/re__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sent</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yent</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ta</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>so</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yo</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sens</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sons</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yens</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yons</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>séd</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>de</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sont</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yont</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sê</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sês</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sêt</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sans</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sâd</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sant</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sêvo</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sêves</l>     <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sêve</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sêvens</l>    <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sêvons</l>    <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sêvâd</l>     <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sêvont</l>    <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ré</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rés</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rat</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rens</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>rons</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>réd</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ront</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>rê</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>rên</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rês</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rêt</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rans</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>rians</l>     <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>râd</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>riâd</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rant</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>riant</l>     <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>so</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ses</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sens</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sons</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>séd</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sont</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sésso</l>     <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sésses</l>    <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sésse</l>     <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>séssens</l>   <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>séssons</l>   <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sésséd</l>    <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>séssont</l>   <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_voy1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_voy2"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sens</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sens</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_cons"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sons</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sons</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_cons"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yens</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yens</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_cons"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yons</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yons</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_cons"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>séd</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>séd</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_voy1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>séds</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_voy2"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>de</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="couére">          <i>coué</i><par n="coué/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nuére">           <i>nué</i><par n="coué/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="recouére">        <i>recoué</i><par n="coué/re__vblex"/></e>
